Illinois, session 104th, HB1635.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by adding Section 7.5 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/7.5 new)7    Sec. 7.5. Health benefits for active members of TRS. By no 8later than January 1, 2026, the Department of Central 9Management Services shall, by rule, establish a program to 10allow the active members of TRS and their dependent 11beneficiaries to participate in the program of group health 12benefits made available under this Act to TRS benefit 13recipients and TRS dependent beneficiaries, including the 14program of group health benefits for Medicare-primary members 15and their Medicare-primary dependents, in lieu of health 16benefits otherwise provided by the school district. The 17Department of Central Management Services shall adopt any 18rules necessary to implement and administer the program 19established under this Section, including, but not limited to, 20the manner of electing to participate in the program, 21eligibility for participation in the program, and 22contributions for coverage through the program.   HB1635- 2 -LRB104 02953 RPS 12969 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.